Rhode Island, session 2025, SB562.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 11-37-3 and 11-37-8.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-37 entitled
"Sexual Assault" are hereby amended to read as follows:
11-37-3. Penalty for first degree sexual assault.
Every person who shall commit sexual assault in the first degree shall be imprisoned for a
period not less than ten (10) fifteen (15) years; provided that, the first ten (10) years shall be served
and the person shall not be afforded the benefits of determent or suspension of sentence and may
be imprisoned for life.
11-37-8.2. Penalty for first degree child molestation sexual assault.
Every person who shall commit first degree child molestation sexual assault shall be
imprisoned for a period of not less than twenty-five (25) years; provided that, the first ten (10) years
shall be served and the person shall not be afforded the benefits of determent or suspension of
sentence and may be imprisoned for life.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall be applicable to all those
offenses committed after the effective date of this section.
========
LC001623
========